Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.45.050

Public service announcements. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

No state elected official or municipal officer may speak or appear in a public service announcement that is broadcast, shown, or distributed in any form whatsoever during the period beginning January 1st and continuing through the general election if that official or officer is a candidate. If the official or officer does not control the broadcast, showing, or distribution of a public service announcement in which he or she speaks or appears, then the official or officer shall contractually limit the use of the public service announcement to be consistent with this section prior to participating in the public service announcement. This section does not apply to public service announcements that are part of the regular duties of the office that only mention or visually display the office or office seal or logo and do not mention or visually display the name of the official or officer in the announcement.

[ 2024 c 164 s 472; 2010 c 204 s 703. Formerly RCW 42.17A.575.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 505, 602, and 703: See note following RCW 29B.30.050.